apertium-sme-smj.sme.lexc
LEXICON VUONAT !+CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Nom:»t K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+SgNomCmp:»t R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Ess:»gin K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»g%> PxC ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen:»ga K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+SgGenCmp:»ga R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»g%> PxC ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc:»ga K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:»t K ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»g%> PxC ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom:»gat K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Ill+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gasa%> PxV ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijddá%> Px1V ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Ill:»gij K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc:»gis K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com:»gijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Gen:»gijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+PlGenCmp:»gijd R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Acc:»gijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Ill:»gijdda K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc:»gijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com:»gijgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gistti%> PxV ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijnni%> PxV ; !
! +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom:»gijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Gen+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijddi%> PxV ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Acc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijddi%> PxV ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Ill+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijddás%> PxC ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijnni%> PxV ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Ess:»hin K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»h%> PxC ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen:»ha K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+SgGenCmp:»ha R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»h%> PxC ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc:»ha K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»h%> PxC ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom:»hat K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Ill+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hasa%> PxV ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijddá%> Px1V ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Ill:»hij K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc:»his K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com:»hijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Gen:»hijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+PlGenCmp:»hijd R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Acc:»hijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Ill:»hijdda K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc:»hijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com:»hijgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»histti%> PxV ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijnni%> PxV ; !
! +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom:»hijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Gen+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijddi%> PxV ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Acc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijddi%> PxV ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Ill+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijddás%> PxC ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijnni%> PxV ; !
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !

LEXICON ACTORder !+CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG !Long compound-forms
 +N: GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped: Px3V ; !
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;
 +N: EssV ;
 +N:X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalNounsV ; !not plausible

!LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORTder !+CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG !Sometimes long compound-forms not in use now
! +N: GOAHTILONGSHORTCMP ;
! +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom: Px3V ; !^P^
! +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7viđá K ;
!! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
! +N: EssV ;
! +N: GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalNounsV ; !not plausible


LEXICON ACTORTVder !+CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG +CmpN/SgLeft +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
 +N+SgNomCmp: R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped: Px3V ; !
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;
 +N: EssV ;
 +N:X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalNounsV ; !not plausible

!LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORTTVder not in use at the moment!+CmpN/SgNCmp +SgGenCmp +PlGenCmp +SgLeft +SgNomLeft +SgGenLeft +PlGenLeft
! +N+SgNomCmp: R ;
! +N+SgNomCmp:X7 R ;
! +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom: Px3V ; !^P^
! +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7viđá K ;
!! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
! +N: EssV ;
! +N: GOAHTI-OBL ;
!! +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ; !not plausible
!! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not plausible
!! +N: DenominalNounsV ; !not plausible


! Adjective derivation
! - - - - - - - - - -


LEXICON LAS
 +Attr:%> ATTR ;  ! To capture the attributive forms before going to N lexica.
 VUOHTA ;
 MUSH ;

LEXICON LEXMUSH
 +N: MUSH ;

LEXICON MUSH  ! Deverbal nouns
 : JOHTOLAT0 ;
 :a MUSSHA ;
! +Der/viđi+Adv:»X7#viđi K ;
 +Der/viđá+Adv:»X7#viđá K ;

LEXICON MUSSHA
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> PxV ; !
 +Ess:%>n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Ped:%>n%> PxC ; !
 :%> LASJOBL ;

LEXICON BUOREMUSS
 : BUOREMUS ;

LEXICON BUOREMUS
 +Attr:%> K ; ! Attributive superlatives
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! JOHTOLAT0 ; !replaced to avoid compound
! VUOHTA ;
 :a%> BUOREMUSSA- ;

LEXICON BUOREMUSSA-
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:X8t K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Ped: PxV ; ! !
 +Ess+Use/Ped:n%> PxC ; !
 EABBUCASE2 ;

LEXICON LEXDIMINC
! +N:X4 DIMINC ;
 +N:%> DIMINC ;

LEXICON DIMINC
 MALIS0 ;
 MALLAS- ;

LEXICON DIMINV
 JOHTOLAT0 ;
 :a%> JOHTOLAHKA- ;

LEXICON HEAPMI
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:»X6ž DIMINC ; !no diminutives for these i think
 +Sg+Nom:X7 K ;
! +Sg+Nom:X1 Px3V ; !^P^ ! tent. reintro
! +Sg+Nom:X7 Px3V ; !^P^ ! tent. reintro
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Ped: PxV ; !
 LASJOBL ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:X8t K ;

LEXICON LAGAN
 +A+Attr:%> K ;
!:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;			!no comp.
! +A:%> GAPPUS- ; !REPLACED TO GET RID OF COMPOUND
! +A:%> GAPPUS0 ; !REPLACED TO GET RID OF COMPOUND
 +A+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +A+SgNomCmp:%>X7 R ;
 +A: VUOHTA ;
 +A+Ess:%>in K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:00%> PxC ; !
 +A+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +A+SgGenCmp:%>a R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +A+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
 +A+Sg+Acc:%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +A+Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:%>asa%> PxV ; !
 +A+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:%>ijddá%> Px1V ; !
 +A+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +A+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
 +A+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +A+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +A+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +A+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +A+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +A+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +A+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +A+Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:%>istti%> PxV ; !
 +A+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:%>ijnni%> PxV ; !
! +A+Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +A+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +A+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +A+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:%>ijddás%> PxC ; !
 +A+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:%>ijnni%> PxV ; !
 +A+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !
 -+Use/Circ:#- ProperNoun ;		 ! ! Definitely circular x 35000.
! # AGADJECT ;          !delete, from nouns, not adjs
! +A tag added, since it now is pointed to directly from the adj
! file, and not from adjectival sublexica.

LEXICON AHKASAS
 +A+Attr:aš%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom:aš%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:ažža%> PxV ; ! ! tentative.
 +A+SgNomCmp:aš%> R ;
 +A+Ess:ažža%>n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Ped:ažža%>n%> PxC ; !
 +A:aš VUOHTA ;
! +A+Adv:ačča%>t K ; !adverbs for these? do not think so
 +A:ažža%> LASJOBL ;
! :ažž DEARVVASLAS ; !not here since these have no comp. forms

LEXICON ETNOLOGALAS	!like AHKASAS but with adverbs
 +A+Attr:aš%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom:aš%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:ažža%> PxV ; ! ! tentative.
 +A+SgNomCmp:aš%> R ;
 +A+Ess:ažža%>n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Ped:ažža%>n%> PxC ; !
 +A:aš VUOHTA ;
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ačča%>t K ;
 +A:ažža%> LASJOBL ;
! :ažž DEARVVASLAS ; !not here since these have no comp. forms

LEXICON NounRoot
aláš:aláž LEXDIMINC ;
 bártnáš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:bártnáž LEXDIMINC ; !
 cealkámuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:cealkámušš LEXMUSH ; !
 cizáš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:cizáž LEXDIMINC ; !
 derpmoš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:derpmož LEXDIMINC ; !
 duottar#civka#leivvoš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:duottar#civka#leivvož LEXDIMINC ; !
 eatnáš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:eatnáž LEXDIMINC ; !
 gáhtamuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:gáhtamušš LEXMUSH ; !
 giella#guovddáš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:giella#guovddáž LEXDIMINC ; !
 goarrumuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:goarrumušš LEXMUSH ; !
 guolbba#viroš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:guolbba#virož LEXDIMINC ; !
 hállamuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:hállamušš LEXMUSH ; !
juolggáš:juolggáž LEXDIMINC ;
 liige#dolggáš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:liige#dolggáž LEXDIMINC ; !
 manjáš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:manjáž LEXDIMINC ; !
 njammáš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:njammáž LEXDIMINC ; !
 ohcamuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:ohcamušš LEXMUSH ; !
ráttáš:ráttáž LEXDIMINC ;
 ruoná#beibboš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ruoná#beibbož LEXDIMINC ; !
 ruovddáš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ruovddáž LEXDIMINC ; !
 siesáš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:siesáž LEXDIMINC ; !
 sohkar#náhpoš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:sohkar#náhpož LEXDIMINC ; !
uhca#diljáš:uhca#diljáž LEXDIMINC ;
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
áigásaš:áigás AHKASAS ;
arkeologalaš:arkeologal ETNOLOGALAS ;
 árvosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:árvos AHKASAS ; !
 bahá#mielalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:bahá#mielal ETNOLOGALAS ; !
 bahás#mielalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:bahás#mielal ETNOLOGALAS ; !
bákkolaš:bákkol ETNOLOGALAS ;
boareslágán LAGAN ;
 boddasaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:boddas AHKASAS ; !
 buorrelágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:buorrelágan LAGAN; !
buorrelágán LAGAN ;
 buot#oaidnevaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:buot#oaidnev ETNOLOGALAS ; !
dábálaš#politihkalaš:dábálaš#politihkal ETNOLOGALAS ;
dákkáraš:dákkár AHKASAS ;
 davvi#norgalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:davvi#norgal AHKASAS ; !
 duhát#jahkásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:duhát#jahkás AHKASAS ; !
 gaskasaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlGenLeft:gaskas AHKASAS ; !
 geassásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:geassás AHKASAS ; !
geo^gráfalaš:geo^gráfal ETNOLOGALAS ;
grammatihkalaš:grammatihkal ETNOLOGALAS ;
guovttelágán LAGAN ;
historjjálaš:historjjál ETNOLOGALAS ;
iežálágán LAGAN ;
journalisttalaš:journalisttal ETNOLOGALAS ;
 juvddálaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:juvddál AHKASAS ; !
lieggalágáš:lieggalágáž LAGAN ;
 lossa#mielalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:lossa#mielal ETNOLOGALAS ; !
 maniijalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:maniijal ETNOLOGALAS ; !
maŋemus+A+Superl:maŋemuss BUOREMUSS ;
maŋimuš+A+Superl:maŋimužž BUOREMUSS ;
 molsa#eaktolaš+Use/Sub:molsa#eaktol ETNOLOGALAS ; !
 našunálalaš+Use/Sub:našunálal ETNOLOGALAS ; !
 norgalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:norgal AHKASAS ; !
 nuortalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:nuortal AHKASAS ; !
 nuppe#loh#jahkásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:nuppe#loh9#jahkás AHKASAS ; !
 ovtta#ahkásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ovtta#ahkás AHKASAS ; !
 ovtta#jienalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ovtta#jienal ETNOLOGALAS ; !
 ovttaskas#lundosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ovttaskas#lundos AHKASAS ; !
 rabas#mielalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:rabas#mielal ETNOLOGALAS ; !
 sadjásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:sadjás AHKASAS ; !
 seamma#guhkkosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:seamma#guhkkos AHKASAS ; !
 sierra#mielalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:sierra#mielal ETNOLOGALAS ; !
smávislágán LAGAN ;
smávislágán:smávislágáž LAGAN ;
 suoma#gielalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:suoma#gielal AHKASAS ; !
 vuollásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:vuollás AHKASAS ; !
 vuoste#hágolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:vuoste7#hágol ETNOLOGALAS ; !
